Alaska statutes. Title 36. Public Contracts.
Article 9. Intergovernmental Relations.

Administrative Code. —

For intergovernmental relations, see 2 AAC 12, art. 14.

Sec. 36.30.700.
Cooperative purchasing authorized.

A public procurement unit may either participate in, sponsor, conduct, or administer a cooperative purchasing agreement for the procurement of supplies, services, professional services, or construction with one or more public procurement units or external procurement activities in accordance with an agreement entered into between the participants.
Cooperative purchasing may include joint or multi-party contracts between public procurement units and open-ended state public procurement units contracts that are made available to local public procurement units.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 36.30.710.
Interagency sale, acquisition, and use of supplies and services.

A public procurement unit may sell to, acquire from, or use any supplies belonging to another public procurement unit or external procurement activity independent of the requirements of AS

36.30.060

and

36.30.100

—

36.30.260

.

A public procurement unit may enter into an agreement, independent of the requirements of AS

36.30.060

and

36.30.100

—

36.30.260

, with another public procurement unit or external procurement activity for the cooperative use of supplies or services under the terms agreed upon between the parties.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 36.30.720.
Joint use or lease of facilities and equipment.

A public procurement unit may enter into agreements for the common use or lease of warehousing facilities, capital equipment, and other facilities with another public procurement unit or an external procurement activity under the terms agreed upon between the parties.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 36.30.730.
Supply of personnel, services, and other items.

A public procurement unit may, upon written request from another public procurement unit or external procurement activity, provide personnel to the requesting public procurement unit or external procurement activity. The public procurement unit or external procurement activity making the request shall pay the public procurement unit providing the personnel the direct and indirect cost of furnishing the personnel, in accordance with an agreement between the parties.

The informational, technical, and other services of a public procurement unit may be made available to another public procurement unit or external procurement activity except that the requirements of the public procurement unit tendering the services has precedence over the requesting public procurement unit or external procurement activity. The requesting public procurement unit or external procurement activity shall pay for the expenses of the services so provided, in accordance with an agreement between the parties.

Upon request, the commissioner may make available to public procurement units or external procurement activities the following services, among others:

standard forms;

printed manuals;

product specifications and standards;

quality assurance testing services and methods;

qualified products lists;

source information;

common use commodities listings;

supplier performance ratings;

lists of persons debarred or suspended from consideration for award of state contracts;

forms for invitations for bids, requests for proposals, instructions to bidders, general contract provisions, and other contract forms; and

contracts or published summaries of them, including price and time of delivery information.

The commissioner may provide the following technical services, among others:

development of product specifications;

development of quality assurance test methods, including receiving, inspection, and acceptance procedures;

use of product testing and inspection facilities; and

use of personnel training programs.

The commissioner may enter into contractual arrangements and publish a schedule of fees for the services provided under (c) and (d) of this section.

[Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 59 ch 14 SLA 1987; am § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991)

Sec. 36.30.735.
Restriction on contracting with or employing experts on radiation hazards.

Except for the Department of Health and Social Services, the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, the Department of Environmental Conservation, and the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs, a state agency may not

contract, other than with the Department of Health and Social Services, to have services performed that require expertise in determining or reducing the hazards of radiation; or

employ a person whose duties require expertise in determining or reducing the hazards of radiation.

In this section, “state agency”

means a state department or agency, whether in the legislative, judicial, or executive branch;

does not include the University of Alaska, a municipality, or an agency of a municipality.

In this section, “radiation” does not include radiation emitted from a Federal Communications Commission licensed facility emitting radiation of a wave length longer than one centimeter and an average power output not exceeding two kilowatts.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 113 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 36.30.740.
Information relating to procurement needs.

To the extent possible, the commissioner may collect information concerning the type, cost, quality, and quantity of commonly used supplies, equipment for the state fleet, services, or construction being procured or used by state public procurement units.
The commissioner may also collect this information from local public procurement units.
The commissioner may make this information available to a public procurement unit upon request.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 36.30.750.
Contract claims of other procurement units.

Under a cooperative purchasing agreement, claims arising between an administering public procurement unit and its bidders, offerors, or contractors shall be resolved in accordance with AS

36.30.560

—

36.30.699

.

A local public procurement unit that is not subject to AS

36.30.560

—

36.30.699

may enter into an agreement with another local public procurement unit or external procurement activity to establish procedures or use that unit’s or activity’s existing procedures to resolve claims with contractors, whether or not the claim arose under a cooperative purchasing agreement.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2003, in accordance with sec. 18, ch. 144, SLA 2003, “claim” was substituted for “controversy” in this section.

Sec. 36.30.790.
Definitions.

In AS

36.30.700

—

36.30.790

,

“cooperative purchasing” means procurement conducted by, or on behalf of, more than one public procurement unit, or by a public procurement unit with an external procurement activity;

“external procurement activity” means a buying organization not located in this state that, if located in this state, would qualify as a public procurement unit; an agency of the United States is an external procurement activity;

“local public procurement unit” means a municipality or other subdivision of the state or other entity that expends public funds for the procurement of supplies, services, professional services, and construction, and any nonprofit corporation operating a charitable hospital;

“public procurement unit” means either a local public procurement unit or a state public procurement unit;

“state public procurement unit” means the Department of Administration and any other contracting agency of the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)